Illinois, session 104th, SB3639.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Professional Regulation Law 5of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 6adding Section 2105-15.6 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-15.6 new)8    Sec. 2105-15.6. Continuing education; automated tracking 9system.10    (a) By no later than January 1, 2027, the Department shall 11develop, obtain, arrange for, or contract with a vendor to 12provide an automated continuing education tracking system that 13can be used by the Department to track compliance with any 14continuing education requirements for the renewal of a 15license.16    (b) The Department may adopt rules or take any 17administrative action necessary for the implementation of this 18Section.19    (c) This Section applies to an application for renewal of 20a license that is received by the Department on or after 21January 1, 2027. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   SB3639- 2 -LRB104 20448 AAS 33913 b1becoming law.